ko: 프리웨이트 랙 타입: 바벨 랙; 콤비네이션 랙; 덤벨 랙; 플로어 스탠드; 가로형 보관 랙; 케틀벨 랙; 세로형 보관 랙; 벽걸이형 랙; 원판 보관 트리; 기타
da: Type af frit vægtstativ: Vægtstangsstativ; Kombinationsstativ; Håndvægtsstativ; Gulvstativ; Vandret opbevaringsstativ; Kettlebell-stativ; Lodret opbevaringsstativ; Vægmonteret stativ; Vægtskivetræ; Andet
pt-BR: Tipo de suporte de peso livre: Rack para barras; Rack combinado; Rack para halteres; Suporte de chão; Rack de armazenamento horizontal; Rack para kettlebell; Rack de armazenamento vertical; Rack montado na parede; Suporte para anilhas; Outro
es: Tipo de estantería de peso libre: Soporte para barra; Soporte combinado; Soporte para mancuernas; Soporte de suelo; Estantería de almacenamiento horizontal; Soporte para pesas rusas; Estantería de almacenamiento vertical; Soporte de montaje en pared; Soporte tipo árbol para discos de pesas; Otro
ro-RO: Tipul suportului pentru greutăți libere: Suport pentru haltere; Suport combinat; Suport pentru gantere; Suport de podea; Suport orizontal de depozitare; Suport pentru kettlebell; Suport vertical de depozitare; Suport cu montare pe perete; Suport tip arbore pentru discuri de greutate; Altele
ru: Тип стойки для свободных весов: Стойка для штанг; Комбинированная стойка; Стойка для гантелей; Напольная подставка; Горизонтальная стойка для хранения; Стойка для гирь; Вертикальная стойка для хранения; Настенная стойка; Стойка-дерево для дисков; Другое
sv: Typ av hantelställ: Skivstångsställning; Kombiställning; Hantelställ; Golvställ; Horisontellt förvaringsställ; Kettlebellställ; Vertikalt förvaringsställ; Väggmonterat ställ; Viktskivsträd; Övrigt
bg-BG: Свободно тегло складов тип стелаж: Стойка за щанги; Комбинирана стойка; Стойка за дъмбели; Подова стойка; Хоризонтална стойка за съхранение; Стойка за пудовки; Вертикална стойка за съхранение; Стойка за стенен монтаж; Стойка тип „дърво“ за тежести; Друго
sl-SI: Tip stojala za proste uteži: Stojalo za dvoročne uteži; Kombinirano stojalo; Stojalo za enoročne uteži; Talno stojalo; Vodoravno stojalo za shranjevanje; Stojalo za kettlebelle; Navpično stojalo za shranjevanje; Stensko stojalo; Stojalo za utežne kolute; Drugo
th: ประเภทโต๊ะทานอาหารแบบฟรีน้ำหนัก: ชั้นวางบาร์เบล; ชั้นวางแบบผสม; ชั้นวางดัมเบล; ขาตั้งพื้น; ชั้นวางแนวนอน; ชั้นวางเคตเทิลเบล; ชั้นวางแนวตั้ง; ชั้นวางติดผนัง; ชั้นวางแผ่นน้ำหนัก; อื่นๆ
zh-TW: 自由重量訓練架類型: 槓鈴架; 組合架; 啞鈴架; 落地架; 水平收納架; 壺鈴架; 垂直收納架; 壁掛架; 槓片架 (樹狀); 其他
ja: フリーウェイトラックタイプ: バーベルラック; コンビネーションラック; ダンベルラック; フロアスタンド; 水平収納ラック; ケトルベルラック; 垂直収納ラック; 壁掛けラック; ウェイトプレートツリー; その他
nb: Frivekts stativtype: Vektstangstativ; Kombinasjonsstativ; Hantelstativ; Gulvstativ; Horisontalt oppbevaringsstativ; Kettlebell-stativ; Vertikalt oppbevaringsstativ; Veggmontert stativ; Vektskivetre; Annet
vi: Loại giá đỡ tạ tự do: Giá để đòn tạ; Giá kết hợp; Giá để tạ tay; Giá để sàn; Giá để nằm ngang; Giá để tạ ấm; Giá để thẳng đứng; Giá gắn tường; Giá treo bánh tạ; Khác
el: Τύπος βάσης ελεύθερων βαρών: Βάση για μπάρες; Βάση συνδυασμών; Βάση για αλτήρες; Επιδαπέδια βάση; Βάση οριζόντιας αποθήκευσης; Βάση για kettlebell; Βάση κάθετης αποθήκευσης; Επιτοίχια βάση; Δέντρο δίσκων βαρών; Άλλο
sk-SK: Stojan na uloženie činiek: Stojan na činky; Kombinovaný stojan; Stojan na jednoručné činky; Podlahový stojan; Horizontálny úložný stojan; Stojan na kettlebelly; Vertikálny úložný stojan; Nástenný stojan; Stojan na kotúče; Iné
lt-LT: Laisvųjų svorių stovo tipas: Štangų stovas; Kombinuotas stovas; Svarmenų stovas; Grindinis stovas; Horizontalus laikymo stovas; Svarsčių stovas; Vertikalus laikymo stovas; Sieninis stovas; Svorių diskų stovas; Kita
pt-PT: Tipo de estante de peso livre: Suporte para barras; Suporte de combinação; Suporte para halteres; Suporte de chão; Suporte de arrumação horizontal; Suporte para kettlebells; Suporte de arrumação vertical; Suporte de montagem na parede; Árvore de discos de peso; Outro
hu: Szabad súlyos állvány típusa: Súlyzóállvány (rúdhoz); Kombinált állvány; Kézisúlyzó-állvány; Padlóállvány; Vízszintes tárolóállvány; Kettlebell állvány; Függőleges tárolóállvány; Fali állvány; Súlytárcsatartó fa; Egyéb
zh-CN: 自由重量货架类型: 杠铃架; 组合架; 哑铃架; 落地架; 水平收纳架; 壶铃架; 垂直收纳架; 壁挂架; 杠铃片存放架; 其他
tr: Serbest ağırlık rafı türü: Halter rafı; Kombinasyon rafı; Dambıl rafı; Zemin standı; Yatay depolama rafı; Kettlebell rafı; Dikey depolama rafı; Duvara monte raf; Ağırlık plakası ağacı; Diğer
pl: Wolne ciężary typu regał: Stojak na sztangi; Stojak wielofunkcyjny; Stojak na hantle; Stojak podłogowy; Stojak poziomy; Stojak na kettlebells; Stojak pionowy; Stojak ścienny; Stojak na obciążenia (drzewko); Inny
hr-HR: Vrsta stalka sa slobodnom težinom: Stalak za dvoručne utege; Kombinirani stalak; Stalak za jednoručne utege; Podni stalak; Vodoravni stalak za pohranu; Stalak za girje; Okomiti stalak za pohranu; Zidni stalak; Stalak za pločaste utege; Ostalo
en: Free weight rack type: Barbell rack; Combination rack; Dumbbell rack; Floor stand; Horizontal storage rack; Kettlebell rack; Vertical storage rack; Wall-mounted rack; Weight plate tree; Other
de: Typ des Freihantelständers: Langhantelständer; Kombinationsständer; Kurzhantelständer; Bodenständer; Horizontales Aufbewahrungsregal; Kettlebell-Regal; Vertikales Aufbewahrungsregal; Wandregal; Hantelscheibenständer; Sonstiges
fr: Type de rack pour poids libres: Support pour haltères longs; Support combiné; Support pour haltères; Support au sol; Support de rangement horizontal; Support pour kettlebells; Support de rangement vertical; Support mural; Arbre à disques de poids; Autre
nl: Vrije gewichtenrek type: Halterrek; Combinatierek; Dumbbellrek; Vloerstandaard; Horizontaal opbergrek; Kettlebellrek; Verticaal opbergrek; Aan de muur gemonteerd rek; Halterschijvenboom; Overige
cs: Typ stojanu na činky: Stojan na velké činky; Kombinovaný stojan; Stojan na jednoručky; Podlahový stojan; Horizontální úložný stojan; Stojan na kettlebelly; Vertikální úložný stojan; Nástěnný stojan; Stojan na kotouče (strom); Jiné
fi: Vapaiden painojen varastohyllyn tyyppi: Levytankoteline; Yhdistelmäteline; Käsipainoteline; Lattiateline; Vaakasäilytysteline; Kahvakuulateline; Pystysäilytysteline; Seinäasennettava teline; Levypainoteline; Muu
it: Tipo di rastrelliera per pesi liberi: Rastrelliera per bilancieri; Rastrelliera combinata; Rastrelliera per manubri; Supporto da pavimento; Rastrelliera orizzontale; Rastrelliera per kettlebell; Rastrelliera verticale; Rastrelliera a parete; Albero porta dischi; Altro